Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.7191, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Insurance holding company systems; various insurance data. Disclosure of information obtained by the commissioner of commercenew text begin or healthnew text end under section 60D.18, 60D.19, or 60D.20 is governed by section 60D.22. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60D.15, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Commissioner. The term "commissioner" means the commissioner of commercenew text begin or, for the purposes of regulating health maintenance organizations, as defined in section 62D.02, subdivision 4, the commissioner of healthnew text end , the new text begin relevant new text end commissioner's deputies, or the Commerce new text begin or Health new text end Department, as appropriate. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60D.21, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Power of commissioner. Subject to the limitation contained in this section and in addition to the powers that the commissioner has under chapter 60A new text begin or 62D new text end relating to the examination of insurers, the commissioner shall also have the power to examine an insurer registered under section 60D.19 and its affiliates to ascertain the financial condition of the insurer, including the enterprise risk to the insurer by the ultimate controlling party, or by an entity or combination of entities within the insurance holding company system, or by the insurance holding company system on a consolidated basis. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60D.21, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Expenses. Each registered insurer producing for examination records, books, and papers pursuant to subdivision 1 is liable for and shall pay the expense of the examination in accordance with section 60A.03new text begin or 62D.14new text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60D.23, is amended to read: 60D.23 RULES. The commissioner may adopt the rules and orders that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.new text begin Health maintenance organizations are subject to Minnesota Rules, chapter 2720, and must comply with the provisions of chapter 2720 applicable to insurers, unless the commissioner of health adopts rules to implement this chapter. Notwithstanding section 14.125, the authority to adopt rules under this section does not expire.new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62D.221, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Insurance provisions applicable to health maintenance organizations. Health maintenance organizations are subject to sections 60A.135, 60A.136, 60A.137, 60A.16, new text begin and new text end 60A.161deleted text begin , 60D.17, 60D.18, and 60D.20deleted text end and must comply with the provisions of these sections applicable to insurers. deleted text begin In applying these sections to health maintenance organizations, "commissioner" means the commissioner of health. Health maintenance organizations are subject to Minnesota Rules, chapter 2720, as applicable to sections 60D.17, 60D.18, and 60D.20, and must comply with the provisions of chapter 2720 applicable to insurers, unless the commissioner of health adopts rules to implement this subdivision.deleted text end